Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.061

Boards in counties with populations of less than one million—Members—Terms—Qualifications.

The boundary review board in each county with a population of less than one million shall consist of five members chosen as follows:

(1) Two persons shall be appointed by the governor;

(2) One person shall be appointed by the county appointing authority;

(3) One person shall be appointed by the mayors of the cities and towns located within the county; and

(4) One person shall be appointed by the board from nominees of special districts in the county.

The governor shall designate one initial appointee to serve a term of two years, and one initial appointee to serve a term of four years, if the appointments are made in an odd-numbered year, or one initial appointee to serve a term of one year, and one initial appointee to serve a term of three years, if the appointments are made in an even-numbered year, with the length of a term being calculated from the first day of February in the year that the appointment was made.

The initial appointee of the county appointing authority shall serve a term of two years, if the appointment is made in an odd-numbered year, or a term of one year, if the appointment is made in an even-numbered year. The initial appointee by the mayors shall serve a term of four years, if the appointment is made in an odd-numbered year, or a term of three years, if the appointment is made in an even-numbered year. The length of the term shall be calculated from the first day in February in the year the appointment was made.

The board shall make one initial appointment from the nominees of special districts to serve a term of two years if the appointment is made in an odd-numbered year, or a term of one year if the appointment is made in an even-numbered year, with the length of the term being calculated from the first day of March in the year in which the appointment is made.

After the initial appointments, all appointees shall serve four-year terms.

No appointee may be an official or employee of the county or a governmental unit in the county, or a consultant or advisor on a contractual or regular retained basis of the county, any governmental unit in the county, or any agency or association thereof.

[ 1991 c 363 s 94; 1989 c 84 s 18.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.